District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0503.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Contract No. CW114997 with Carahsoft Technology Corporation
Approval and Payment Authorization Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51), and notwithstanding the
requirements of section 202 of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8,
2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-352.02), the Council approves Modification
Nos. M007 and M008 and proposed Modification No. M009 to Contract No. CW114997 with
Carahsoft Technology Corporation and authorizes payment in the not-to-exceed amount of
$1,909,658.58 for the goods and services received and to be received under the contract.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2